Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
SENTENCING OF SEX OFFENDERS

16-13-201. Short title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 255, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-201.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-901.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-201.5. Applicability of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1288, § 2, effective November 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-902.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-202. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 255, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-202.

L. 75:

(5) R&RE, p. 631, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 902, § 5, effective August 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-903.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-203. Indeterminate commitment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-203.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-904.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-204. Requirements before acceptance of a plea of guilty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-204.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-905.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-205. Commencement of proceedings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-205.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-906.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-206. Defendant to be advised of rights. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-206.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-907.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-207. Psychiatric examination and report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 256, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-207.

L. 91:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1142, § 4, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-908.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-208. Report of probation department. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 257, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-208.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-909.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-209. Termination of proceedings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 257, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-209.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-910.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-210. Evidentiary hearing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 257, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-210.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-911.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-211. Findings of fact and conclusions of law. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 258, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-211.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-912.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-212. Appeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 258, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-212.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-913.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-213. Time allowed on sentence. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 258, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-213.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-914.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-214. Costs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 258, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-214.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-915.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-215. Diagnostic center as receiving center. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 258, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-215.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 684, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to § 18-1.3-916.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-13-216. Powers and duties of the board.

Within six months after a person is committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., and at least once during each twelve months thereafter, the board shall review all reports, records, and information concerning said person, for the purpose of determining whether said person shall be paroled.

The board shall, in each instance, make a written ruling and shall serve a copy of the ruling upon the said person.

The board is authorized and it is its duty to order the transfer of any person committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., if the board deems it to be in the best interests of said person and the public, to any facility under the jurisdiction of the department or to the department of human services subject to the availability of staff and housing.

The board is granted exclusive control over the parole and reparole of all persons committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., regardless of the facility in which those persons are confined.

The board is authorized to parole and reparole, and to commit and recommit for violation of parole, any person committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S.

The board is authorized to issue an absolute release to any person committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., if the board deems it in the best interests of that person and the public and that the person, if at large, would not constitute a threat of bodily harm to members of the public.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, the board has all the powers conferred and duties imposed upon it with respect to the parole of prisoners generally, in the parole and supervision of persons committed pursuant to section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 259, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-216.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 524, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2652, § 128, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1498, § 152, effective October 1.

Cross references:

(1) For liability for the costs of the care and treatment of persons transferred to a facility under the jurisdiction of the department of human services pursuant to this section, see § 27-92-101.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.